Missouri, session 2026, HB3004.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 407.3300, to read as follows:
407.3300. 1. No person, company, or business shall sell or market products using
the term wood without the product's decorative surface being made of solid wood or
wood veneer, originating from a tree. No person, company, or business shall advertise
or sell any part of a product marketed using wood-related terms or names of wood
species including, but not limited to, oak, maple, cherry, pine, and walnut if the
product's decorative surface is not that wood species.
2. A person, company, or business may sell any product physically located within
the state as of August 28, 2026, that is packaged in violation of the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section if the product is clearly labeled: "This product is not made
from wood.". After August 28, 2026, no additional products shall enter the state if the
packaging is in violation of subsection 1 of this section.
3. The department of agriculture may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS for HB 3004 2
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔